Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 19

Registration of Public Obligations

9-19-101. Short title.

This chapter may be known as the “Tennessee Public Obligations Registration Act.”

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 1.

9-19-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Book-entry form” means, with respect to public obligations, obligations that are not represented by an instrument but are evidenced and transferred on registration books maintained for that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer;

“Facsimile seal” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the seal of the issuer, official or official body;

“Facsimile signature” means the reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means of the manual signature of an authorized officer;

“Financial intermediary” means a bank, broker, or clearing corporation or the nominee of any of them, or other person or nominee which in the ordinary course of its business maintains public obligation accounts for its customers, when so acting;

“Issuer” means any entity, department, or agency which under the laws of this state issues public obligations. “Issuer” may thus include the state of Tennessee, agencies of the state of Tennessee and all political subdivisions and public instrumentalities of the state of Tennessee, including, without limitation, cities, towns, metropolitan governments, counties, authorities, districts, and corporations or other public entities;

“Official” or “official body” means the officer or board that is empowered under the laws of this state to provide for original issuance of a public obligation of the issuer, by defining the obligation and its terms, conditions and other incidents, the successor or successors of any such official or official body, and such other person or group of persons as shall be assigned duties of such official or official body under applicable law from time to time;

“Official actions” means the actions by statute, order, ordinance, charter, resolution, contract, or other authorized means by which the issuer provides for issuance of a public obligation; and

“Public obligation” means an agreement of an issuer to pay principal and any interest thereon, whether in the form of a contract to repay borrowed money, a lease, an installment purchase agreement, or otherwise, and includes a share, participation, or other interest in any such agreement.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 2.

9-19-103. Authorization to issue public obligations.

Notwithstanding any other law, issuers are hereby authorized to issue public obligations in fully registered form. Such obligations in fully registered form may, if permitted by the official action authorizing public obligations, be issued in book-entry form. If permitted by the official actions authorizing public obligations, obligations in fully registered form and in bearer form shall be exchangeable from time to time.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 3.

9-19-104. Registration agents — Paying agents.

Any issuer of fully registered public obligations is authorized to appoint a registration agent or agents and paying agent or agents with respect to the issuance, exchange and transfer of such public obligations or to maintain records so that public obligations in book-entry form may be effected, with such duties as shall be determined by the issuer. Any such registration agent may be a bank, trust company, financial institution or other financial intermediary within or without this state, including the federal government or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. The state funding board is authorized to adopt such guidelines as it deems necessary relative to the qualifications that such bank, trust company, financial institution, or other financial intermediary must meet to qualify as a registration agent or paying agent for any fully registered public obligations to be issued by any issuer in Tennessee. Any issuer may act as its own registration agent and paying agent in accordance with such terms and conditions as may be established by the state funding board. Any issuer, including the state of Tennessee, may, upon approval by the state funding board, appoint the state of Tennessee, acting by and through the comptroller of the treasury, as registration agent and the state of Tennessee, acting by and through the state treasurer, as paying agent.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 4.

9-19-105. Records and books.

The registration agent shall keep such books as shall be necessary in connection with the issuance, exchange and transfer of fully registered public obligations. Any issuer may provide that no such fully registered public obligation shall be valid for any purpose unless certified or authenticated by such registration agent, and if so provided, then such fully registered public obligation shall be valid only if so certified or authenticated by the manual signature of an officer of such registration agent.

The issuance and transference of a public obligation in book-entry form shall be effected by means of entries on the records of the registration agent which shall reflect the description of the issue, the principal amount, the interest rate, the maturity date, the owner of the public obligation and such other information as the issuer deems appropriate. If so permitted by the official actions authorizing public obligations, conversions may be effectuated between such obligations in book-entry form and registered public obligations evidenced by an instrument for owners of obligations who request such a change. The registration agent shall issue a confirmation of a book-entry transaction in the form of a written advice to the appropriate parties thereto. Such written advice shall confer no rights on the recipient, and shall be neither a negotiable instrument nor a security.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 5.

9-19-106. Signatures and seals.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, public obligations issued in registered form are not required to bear manual signatures of officials of the issuer if such public obligations bear facsimile signatures in lieu thereof, and are certified or authenticated with the manual signature of an officer of the registration agent, and if the use of such facsimile signatures and certification or authentication is provided for in the official actions of the official body authorizing such obligations.

In case any official of the issuer whose signature or facsimile signature appears on a public obligation shall cease to hold office before the delivery thereof to the initial purchasers or before any exchange or transfer between subsequent holders thereof, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid for all purposes the same as if such official had remained in office until after such delivery, exchange or transfer.

When a seal is required or permitted in the execution of any public obligation, the seal may be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, no signature or endorsement shall be required upon the original issuance or subsequent transfer of fully registered public obligations in the event that such obligations are issued in book-entry form.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 6.

9-19-107. Notice of redemption.

In the event fully registered public obligations are subject to redemption by the terms thereof, the issuer may redeem one (1) or more of such obligations or portions thereof by giving the notice specified by the official actions authorizing such obligations or, in the event no provision for notice is therein specified, by mailing or directing the registration agent to mail, postage prepaid, not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for redemption, to the registered owners of such obligations which are to be redeemed at their last address appearing upon the registration books, a notice that the issuer is calling for redemption prior to maturity of such obligations in accordance with the terms thereof. Such notice shall specify the number, issue, date, date fixed for redemption, the date interest will cease to accrue, the redemption price and such further information with respect to such obligations as may be required by the terms thereof. Such notice may be waived by the registered owner of the public obligation subject to redemption.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 7.

9-19-108. Interest.

Interest on fully registered public obligations shall be payable on such dates as shall be specified in the official actions authorizing such obligations to the record owners of such obligations as of such record dates as shall be specified in the official actions.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 8.

9-19-109. Confidentiality of owner's identity.

The identity of any owner of, or any other information by or from which may be determined the identity of any owner of, any public obligation issued by any issuer shall be treated as confidential and not open to public inspection. The confidentiality herein established shall not be deemed to have been extinguished but shall remain inviolate in cases where such information is in the possession of banks, trust companies, financial institutions or other financial intermediaries of the issuer, including, but not limited to, registration, paying or transfer agents.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

9-19-110. Construction of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and without regard to the provisions, requirements or restrictions of any other law. The provisions hereof are not in substitution for the powers conferred by any other law. In the event that the provisions hereof conflict with other provisions of general or special law or charter provisions, the provisions hereof shall be deemed to control.

Acts 1983, ch. 100, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).